dev/xfst2apertium.useless.twol
! See lexicons NAMAT and SAS for these:
%+Der%/agat
%+Der%/bealat
%+Der%/bealjat
%+Der%/borat
%+Der%/bánat
%+Der%/dábat
%+Der%/dáfot
%+Der%/dáhtot
%+Der%/dásat
%+Der%/dávddat
%+Der%/dávttat
%+Der%/fárddat
%+Der%/gaccat
%+Der%/garat
%+Der%/gearddat
%+Der%/geažat
%+Der%/gielat
%+Der%/gieđat
%+Der%/gieškkat
%+Der%/gilggat
%+Der%/girjjat
%+Der%/guvllot
%+Der%/heakkat
%+Der%/hájat
%+Der%/hámat
%+Der%/ivnnat
%+Der%/jagat
%+Der%/jearggat
%+Der%/jienat
%+Der%/jierpmat
%+Der%/joccat
%+Der%/juolggat
%+Der%/juvllat
%+Der%/kultuvrrat
%+Der%/asat
%+Der%/lahkat
%+Der%/lahtot
%+Der%/lanjat
%+Der%/leakkat
%+Der%/liikkat
%+Der%/linjjat
%+Der%/lunddot
%+Der%/luottat
%+Der%/láiddat
%+Der%/mearkkat
%+Der%/mielat
%+Der%/mohkat
%+Der%/muđot
%+Der%/máhtat
%+Der%/mállet
%+Der%/namat
%+Der%/nađat
%+Der%/nierat
%+Der%/njunat
%+Der%/njálmmat
%+Der%/nuo0lus
%+Der%/náittot
%+Der%/sorttat
%+Der%/nálat
%+Der%/oaivvat
%+Der%/oasat
%+Der%/áissat
%+Der%/olat
%+Der%/orddat
%+Der%/pláhtat
%+Der%/rattat
%+Der%/ravddat
%+Der%/rávnnjat
%+Der%/seagat
%+Der%/seaibbat
%+Der%/seainnat
%+Der%/siiddot
%+Der%/soajat
%+Der%/sogat
%+Der%/soarttat
%+Der%/stábat
%+Der%/stávval
%+Der%/suorat
%+Der%/suorggat
%+Der%/suorpmat
%+Der%/suttat
%+Der%/sánat
%+Der%/sávnnjat
%+Der%/šlájat
%+Der%/uvssat
%+Der%/uvssot
%+Der%/varat
%+Der%/vigat
%+Der%/vuovttat
%+Der%/vuđot
%+Der%/váillat
%+Der%/váimmot
%+Der%/válddat
%+Der%/váttot
%+Der%/ávjjot
%+Der%/čalmmat
%+Der%/čeavžžat
%+Der%/čiegat
%+Der%/čielggat
%+Der%/čoalat
%+Der%/čoarvvat
%+Der%/čuolmmat
%+Der%/čuvddat
%+Der%/hámat
%+Der%/vahkkosaš
%+Der%/čiegahas
%+Der%/luohkálaš
%+Der%/luohkkálaš
%+Der%/viidosaš
%+Der%/kilosaš
%+Der%/diibmosaš
%+Der%/dássásaš
%+Der%/mánnosaš
%+Der%/buddásaš
%+Der%/geardásaš
%+Der%/áigásaš
%+Der%/ahkásaš
%+Der%/jahkásaš
%+Der%/beaivásaš
%+Der%/vahkosaš
%+Der%/mannosaš
%+Der%/siessat

%+Der%/A
! Der#end
;


Rules 



"Delete Use-tags etc. that we don't use"
Vu:0 <=> _ ; where Vu in Useless;
!! Removing tags with hfst-substitute will give duplicate analyses, so
!! we do it here instead.



"Only allow those derivations that survive bidix/transfer"
Vu /<= _ ; where Vu in UnhandledDerivation;
!! Fail if analysis contains derivations that are not handled in
!! bidix/transfer.

"No derivations of derivations"
Vd /<= Derivation+ PartOfSpeech+ [ %+TV | %+IV | %+Attr | [] ] Useless:0* _ ; where Vd in Derivation;
!! Although Der/foo and Der/bar might be handled by bidix/transfer,
!! Der/foo N Der/bar isn't necessarily.



"No consecutive V tags (giellatekno bug?)"
%+V /<= %+V _ ;


!! We create exceptions to the above rule by simply removing the inner
!! PartOfSpeech tag in those contexts where the double derivation has
!! bidix entries:
"Allow +V+Der2+Der/PassL+V+Der3+Der/n+N (removing inner PoS tag)"
%+V:0 <=> %+V Transitivity %+Der2 %+Der%/PassL _ %+Der3 %+Der%/n %+N ;

"Allow +V+Der1+Der/j+V+Der2+Der/PassL+V (removing inner PoS tag)"
%+V:0 <=> %+V Transitivity %+Der1 %+Der%/j _ %+Der2 %+Der%/PassL %+V ;



"Delete the %- that was added to a lemma used in a dynamic compound"
%-:0 <=> %+Cmp _ ;

"Delete semantic tags that appear before noun tags"
ProperSemantic:0 <=> _ ProperSemantic:0* Useless:0* %+N ;
! These should be allowed only after proper nouns: %+Mal %+Fem %+Sur  %+Plc  %+Org  %+Obj  %+Ani 
